Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1324HV (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 873 Section 1. Section 232.96A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. The child is in need of treatment to cure or alleviate a 3 serious chemical dependency or mental illness or disorder, or 4 emotional damage as evidenced by severe anxiety, depression, 5 withdrawal, or behavioral health disorder that compromises the 6 childâs safety or causes untoward aggressive behavior toward 7 the childâs self or others in the household or the childâs 8 community, and the childâs parent, guardian, or custodian is 9 unwilling or unable to provide such treatment or the parentâs, 10 guardianâs, or custodianâs efforts to secure needed treatment 11 have been exhausted and unsuccessful . 12 Sec. 2. Section 232.96A, subsection 13, Code 2025, is 13 amended by striking the subsection. 14 Sec. 3. Section 234.38, Code 2025, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 234.38 Foster care reimbursement rates. 17 The department shall make reimbursement payments directly 18 to foster parents for services provided to children pursuant 19 to section 234.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âeâ , subparagraph 20 (2), or section 234.35 . In any fiscal year, the reimbursement 21 rate shall be based upon sixty-five percent of the United 22 States department of agriculture estimate of the cost to raise 23 a child in the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal 24 year. The department may pay an additional stipend for a child 25 with special needs. The department shall review reimbursement 26 payment rates paid to foster parents under this section no less 27 than once every three years. The department shall adopt rules 28 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 29 Sec. 4. Section 600.8, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 3. a. The department, an agency, or a certified adoption 32 investigator shall conduct all investigations and reports 33 required under subsection 2 . 34 b. The department shall pay the costs of the preplacement 35 -1- LSB 1324HV (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 873 investigation under subsection 2 and the postplacement 1 investigation under subsection 4, up to a maximum of two 2 thousand dollars for the preplacement investigation and up 3 to a maximum of two thousand dollars for the postplacement 4 investigation. 5 c. The department shall not pay the costs of the 6 preplacement investigation or the postplacement investigation 7 as required under paragraph âbâ until a prospective adoption 8 petitioner has been approved under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , 9 subparagraph (3), by the person making the investigation. 10 Sec. 5. Section 600A.6B, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 11 amended to read as follows: 12 1. A person filing a petition for termination of parental 13 rights under this chapter shall be responsible for the payment 14 of reasonable attorney fees for services provided by counsel 15 appointed pursuant to section 600A.6A , in juvenile court or 16 in an appellate proceeding initiated by the person filing the 17 petition , unless the any of the following apply: 18 a. The person filing the petition is a private child-placing 19 agency licensed under chapter 238 or the . 20 b. The person filing the petition is a licensed attorney. 21 c. The court determines that the person filing the petition, 22 is indigent. 23 2. If the person filing the petition is a private 24 child-placing agency licensed under chapter 238 or if the 25 person filing the petition is indigent described in subsection 26 1, paragraph âaâ , âbâ , or âcâ , the prospective parent on whose 27 behalf the petition is filed shall be responsible for the 28 payment of reasonable attorney fees for services provided in 29 juvenile court or an appellate proceeding for counsel appointed 30 pursuant to section 600A.6A unless the court determines that 31 the prospective parent on whose behalf the petition is filed 32 is indigent. 33